Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,133
Furnishing information; exemption from liability.

(1) Any person acting without malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith shall be immune from any civil liability by virtue of filing reports or furnishing other information required by Chapter 44 or required by the Director of Insurance under the authority granted in Chapter 44.

(2) The Director of Insurance or any employee of the Department of Insurance acting without malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith shall be immune from any civil liability by virtue of the publication of any report or bulletin related to the official activities of the Department of Insurance.

(3) This section shall not abrogate or modify in any way any common-law or statutory privilege or immunity.

Laws 1987, LB 399, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 12.